Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8069.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 11-47 of the General Laws entitled "Weapons" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
11-47-60.5. Suicide awareness at shooting ranges.
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) “Firearm” shall have the same definition as provided in § 11-55-1; and
(2) “Shooting range” means a rifle, pistol, silhouette, skeet, trap, black powder, or other
similar range designed and operated for the use of firearms on site, including any range located on
public or private land or operated by a public or private entity.
(b) Every shooting range shall conspicuously display a sign containing the information set
forth is subsection (c) of this section, in any areas where shooting activity occurs. The required
signs shall be posted in a manner in order that they can be easily viewed by people utilizing the
shooting range and shall not be removed, obscured or rendered illegible.
(c) Each sign shall be at least eight and one-half inches (8.5”) high by eleven inches (11”)
wide and feature black text against a white background and letters that are in at least thirty-six (36)
point font. The signs shall contain the following text, in English and Spanish: “WARNING: If you
or a loved one is experiencing distress and/or depression, call the 988 Suicide and Crisis hotline or
text “HOME” to 741741”. The signs shall not contain any other text.
(d) A shooting range that operates on a membership basis shall require any person who is
not a member of the shooting range, to be accompanied at all times by a member of the range or

staff member of the range while on the premises and while engaging in shooting activity.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005207/SUB A
========
LC005207/SUB A - Page 2 of 3